New York, session 2025-2026, A1300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 26-1301 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York, as added by local law number 136 for the year 2017, is amended 3 by adding a twelfth undesignated paragraph to read as follows: 4 "Small property owner" shall mean any lessor in a residential real 5 property transaction, and includes an owner of twenty units or less who 6 lists residential real property for lease with an agent, whether or not 7 a lease results, or who receives an offer to lease twenty units of resi- 8 dential real property or less in the city of New York. 9 § 2. Section 26-1303 of the administrative code of the city of New 10 York is amended by adding a new subdivision e to read as follows: 11 e. Any small property owner shall be entitled to free legal services 12 if such small property owner can prove a loss of at least twenty percent 13 of rent payments in a calendar year. 14 § 3. The real property actions and proceedings law is amended by 15 adding a new section 703 to read as follows: 16 § 703. Small property owner; legal services. Any small property owner 17 shall be entitled to free legal services if such small property owner 18 can prove a loss of at least twenty percent of rent payments in a calen- 19 dar year. For the purposes of this section, "small property owner" 20 shall mean any lessor in a residential real property transaction, and 21 includes an owner of twenty units or less who lists residential real 22 property for lease with an agent, whether or not a lease results, or who 23 receives an offer to lease twenty units of residential real property or 24 less. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00712-01-5 A. 1300 2 1 § 4. The real property actions and proceedings law is amended by 2 adding a new section 770-a to read as follows: 3 § 770-a. Small property owner; legal services. Any small property 4 owner shall be entitled to free legal services if such small property 5 owner can prove a loss of at least twenty percent of rent payments in a 6 calendar year. For the purposes of this section, "small property owner" 7 shall mean any lessor in a residential real property transaction, and 8 includes an owner of twenty units or less who lists residential real 9 property for lease with an agent, whether or not a lease results, or who 10 receives an offer to lease twenty units of residential real property or 11 less. 12 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 13 have become a law.